Hawaii statutes.
§386-127 Cancellation of insurance
contracts. No policy or contract of insurance issued by a stock company or
mutual association against liability arising under this chapter shall be
canceled within the time limited in the contract for its expiration until at
least ten days after notice of intention to cancel such contract, on a date
specified in the notice, has been filed with and served on the director of
labor and industrial relations and the employer. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1;
Supp, §97-126; HRS §386-127]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next